Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-112
Jail conductor; appointment; salary.

In counties having a population in excess of two hundred thousand inhabitants where the jail is situated above the ground floor and requires an operator for an elevator to transfer the prisoners to and from said jail, there shall be a jail conductor to operate said elevator, to be appointed by the sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail, who shall be paid such salary as the county board may think reasonable and proper by warrant drawn on the general fund.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 10, p. 245;

Laws 1903, c. 55, § 1, p. 346;

R.S.1913, § 3538;

Laws 1919, c. 113, § 1, p. 277;

C.S.1922, § 3005;

C.S.1929, § 47-110;

R.S.1943, § 47-112;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 16, p. 208;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 17.